Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.120

Professional certification not required of superintendents or deputy or assistant superintendents.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the Washington professional educator standards board or superintendent of public instruction shall not require any professional certification or other qualifications of any person elected superintendent of a local school district by that district's board of directors, or any person hired in any manner to fill a position designated as, or which is, in fact, deputy superintendent, or assistant superintendent.

[ 2005 c 497 s 208; 1990 c 33 s 411; 1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.02.260.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 254: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 4.]